Utah statutes.
76-7-304.   Considerations by physician -- Notice to a parent or guardian --
Exceptions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "abuse" is as defined in Section 78A-6-105; and
(b)  "minor" means a person who is:
(i)  under 18 years of age;
(ii)  unmarried; and
(iii)  not emancipated.
(2)  To enable the physician to exercise the physician's best medical
judgment, the physician shall consider all factors relevant to the well-being
of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed including:
(a)  her physical, emotional and psychological health and safety;
(b)  her age; and
(c)  her familial situation.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), at least 24 hours before a physician performs
an abortion on a minor, the physician shall notify a parent or guardian of the
minor that the minor intends to have an abortion.
(4)  A physician is not required to comply with Subsection (3) if:
(a)  subject to Subsection (5)(a):
(i)  a medical condition exists that, on the basis of the physician's good
faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant
minor as to necessitate the abortion of her pregnancy to avert:
(A)  the minor's death; or
(B)  a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major
bodily function of the minor; and
(ii)  there is not sufficient time to give the notice required under
Subsection (3) before it is necessary to terminate the minor's pregnancy in
order to avert the minor's death or impairment described in Subsection
(4)(a)(i);
(b)  subject to Subsection (5)(b):
(i)  the physician complies with Subsection (6); and
(ii) (A)  the minor is pregnant as a result of incest to which the parent or
guardian was a party; or
(B)  the parent or guardian has abused the minor; or
(c)  subject to Subsection (5)(b), the parent or guardian has not assumed
responsibility for the minor's care and upbringing.
(5) (a)  If, for the reason described in Subsection (4)(a), a physician does
not give the 24-hour notice described in Subsection (3), the physician shall
give the required notice as early as possible before the abortion, unless it
is necessary to perform the abortion immediately in order to avert the minor's
death or impairment described in Subsection (4)(a)(i).
(b)  If, for a reason described in Subsection (4)(b) or (c), a parent or
guardian of a minor is not notified that the minor intends to have an
abortion, the physician shall notify another parent or guardian of the minor,
if the minor has another parent or guardian that is not exempt from
notification under Subsection (4)(b) or (c).
(6)  If, for a reason described in Subsection (4)(b)(ii)(A) or (B), a
physician does not notify a parent or guardian of a minor that the minor
intends to have an abortion, the physician shall report the incest or abuse to
the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human
Services.
